Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1843.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Rental rates; state-owned buildings; fiscal year 2026-2027 Notwithstanding section 41-792.01, subsection D, Arizona Revised Statutes, the capital outlay stabilization fund rental rates for state-owned buildings in fiscal year 2026-2027 are $17.87 per square foot for office space and $6.43 per square foot for storage space.